Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3114.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 39 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 10A the following section:
SECTION 10B.
(a) In a town having a representative or open town meeting form of government, the town
moderator may, in consultation with the select board and local public safety or public health
officials, call for any town meeting to be held through remote participation or a hybrid of in-
person and remote participation, including, but not limited to, by means of a video or telephone
conferencing platform. If a town does not have a moderator, the select board may call for any
town meeting to be held through remote participation or a hybrid of in-person and remote
participation in accordance with this paragraph.
(b) A notice of decision to hold town meeting through remote participation or a hybrid of
in-person and remote participation shall be prepared by the moderator and printed in a legible,
of 5

easily understandable format and shall contain: (i) the moderator’s determination and request to
hold a town meeting through remote participation or a hybrid of in-person and remote
participation in accordance with this section; (ii) the video or telephone conferencing platform
the moderator has determined to use to hold the town meeting; (iii) confirmation that the
moderator has consulted with the local disability commission or coordinator for federal
Americans with Disabilities Act compliance; (iv) confirmation that the moderator has consulted
with the select board; and (v) a certification by the moderator that: (A) the moderator has tested
the video or telephone conferencing platform; and (B) the platform satisfactorily enables the
remote portion of the town meeting to be conducted in substantially the same manner as if the
meeting occurred in person at a physical location and in accordance with the operational and
functional requirements set forth in this section.
(c) A video or telephone conference platform used by a town meeting for remote
participation under this section shall, at minimum:
(i) strictly limit voting at an open, remote, or hybrid town meeting to only those
confirmed by the town clerk to be eligible to vote at that meeting, Each person deemed eligible
to vote shall be provided with appropriate physical or technological participation credentials
designed to allow remote participation of all eligible voters while also establishing regularity in
administration, minimizing inaccurate results and creating and maintaining a virtual and physical
environment free from fraud;
(ii) enable the moderator, voters, representative town meeting members, town officials
and any other interested members of the public to identify and hear the moderator and each voter
or other speaker recognized by the moderator, whether remotely or in person;
of 5

(iii) if applicable, determine whether a quorum is present;
(iv) enable a voter, town meeting member, town official or other individual authorized to
participate in the meeting to request recognition by the moderator without prior authorization,
consistent with any town meeting rules established by bylaw, charter or special act. To the extent
technologically feasible, the request shall be visible or audible to the town meeting and the
public in real time and upon review of the recording of the town meeting proceedings, preserved
according to subsection (g);
(v) enable the moderator to determine when a remote or in person voter wishes to be
recognized to speak, make a motion, raise a point of order or object to a request for unanimous
consent;
(vi) enable the moderator to recognize a remote or in person voter, town official or other
individual to speak and to enable that person to speak;
(vii) in the case of a representative town meeting, enable the moderator the ability to
conduct a roll call vote;
(viii) enable any interested members of the public to access the meeting remotely for
purposes of witnessing the deliberations and actions taken at the town meeting, subject to the
provisions of any municipal charter; and
(ix) enable the town meeting to be recorded.
(d) (i) Registered voters, other than representatives elected or appointed in accordance
with applicable state or local law, seeking to participate remotely in a representative town
meeting shall, not less than 48 hours in advance, submit to the town moderator a request to
of 5

participate in the meeting. Upon receipt of the request and verification of the requester’s voter
registration status, the designated official shall provide appropriate physical or technological
participation credentials; nothing herein shall be construed to require greater participation by
voters or non-town meeting members than required by any applicable general or special law or
municipal charter.
(ii) Eligible registered voters seeking to participate remotely in an open town meeting
shall be provided with instructions, no later than 48 hours in advance, as to how to access
appropriate physical or technological participation credentials; provided, however that the
inability to comply with this subparagraph shall require that the meeting be delayed until a
quorum is reached or 30 minutes has passed, whichever occurs later.
(e) Prior to taking up any business at a remote or hybrid town meeting, and following the
determination of a quorum, if applicable, the meeting shall vote on whether to commence the
business of the meeting using remote or hybrid access. If the town meeting votes to continue,
then the town meeting shall proceed to hold a remote or hybrid meeting to address the articles in
the warrant. If the town meeting votes not to conduct the town meeting by remote or hybrid
means, then the town meeting shall be adjourned, without further action, to the date, time and
place specified in the notice or warrant or to such other time, date and place as may be approved
by town meeting.
(f) Votes taken by a roll call vote at a remote or hybrid representative town meeting shall
be recorded and kept with the minutes of the town meeting.
(g) A remote or hybrid town meeting shall be recorded and the recording shall be
preserved and made publicly available on the town’s website for at least 90 days after the
of 5

dissolution of said town meeting and until the official minutes of the meeting have been prepared
by the town clerk.
of 5